Missouri, session 2026, HB3307.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 37, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 37.1370, to read as follows:
37.1370. The state shall not contract with any telecommunications conglomerate
2 founded in 1885 and headquartered in Dallas, Texas.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.